Utah statutes.
9-4-922.   Act not restriction on powers of corporation -- Construed as
alternative -- Bonds, notes, obligations issued need not comply with other
laws.
(1)  This part and its contents is not or may not be construed as a
restriction or limitation upon any other powers which the corporation might
otherwise have under any other law of this state, and this part is cumulative
to those powers.
(2)  This part does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional,
and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized in this part and
shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other
laws.
(3)  The issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations under the provisions
of this part need not comply with the requirements of any other state law
applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations.
(4)  Proceedings, notice, or approval are not required for the issuance of any
bonds, notes, and other obligations or any instrument as security therefor,
except as provided in this part.
